Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 2
OPTIONAL PROVISIONS

25.5-5-201. Optional provisions - optional groups - rules.

The federal government allows the state to select optional groups to receive medical assistance. Pursuant to federal law, any person who is eligible for medical assistance under the optional groups specified in this section must receive both the mandatory services specified in sections 25.5-5-102 and 25.5-5-103 and the optional services specified in sections 25.5-5-202 and 25.5-5-203. Subject to the availability of federal financial aid funds, the following are the individuals or groups that Colorado has selected as optional groups to receive medical assistance pursuant to this article 5 and articles 4 and 6 of this title 25.5:

Individuals who would be eligible for but are not receiving cash assistance;

Individuals who would be eligible for cash assistance except for their institutionalized status;

Individuals receiving home- and community-based services as specified in article 6 of this title;

Repealed.

Individuals receiving only optional state supplement;

Individuals in institutions who are eligible under a special income level. Colorado's program for citizens sixty-five years of age or older or physically disabled or blind, whose gross income does not exceed three hundred percent of the current federal supplemental security income benefit level, qualifies for federal funding under this provision.

Persons who are eligible for cash assistance under the works program pursuant to section 26-2-706, C.R.S.;

Persons who are eligible for the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program pursuant to section 25.5-5-308;

Individuals who are qualified aliens and were or would have been eligible for supplemental security income as a result of a disability but are not eligible for such supplemental security income as a result of the passage of the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Public Law 104-193;

Other qualified aliens who entered or were present in the United States before August 22, 1996;

Children for whom subsidized adoption assistance payments are made by the state pursuant to article 7 of title 26, C.R.S., or foster care maintenance payments are made by the state pursuant to article 5 of title 26, C.R.S., but who do not meet the requirements of Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act", as amended;

Parents and caretaker relatives of children who are eligible for the medical assistance program whose family income does not exceed one hundred thirty-three percent of the federal poverty line, adjusted for family size;

Pregnant women, whose family income does not exceed one hundred ninety-five percent of the federal poverty line, adjusted for family size;

Repealed.

Individuals with disabilities who are participating in the medicaid buy-in program established in part 14 of article 6 of this title.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1)(o)(I) of this section, if the money in the healthcare affordability and sustainability fee cash fund established pursuant to section 25.5-4-402.4, together with the corresponding federal matching funds, is insufficient to fully fund all of the purposes described in section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(b), after receiving recommendations from the Colorado healthcare affordability and sustainability enterprise established pursuant to section 25.5-4-402.4 (3), for individuals with disabilities who are participating in the medicaid buy-in program established in part 14 of article 6 of this title 25.5, the state board by rule adopted pursuant to the provisions of section 25.5-4-402.4 (6)(b)(III) may reduce the medical benefits offered or the percentage of the federal poverty line to below four hundred fifty percent or may eliminate this eligibility group.

Repealed.

Subject to federal approval, adults who are childless or without a dependent child in the home, as described in section 1902 (a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of the social security act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396a, who have attained nineteen years of age but have not attained sixty-five years of age, and whose family income does not exceed one hundred thirty-three percent of the federal poverty line, adjusted for family size;

Children who are continuously eligible for twelve months pursuant to section 25.5-5-204.5;

Persons eligible for a medicaid buy-in program established pursuant to section 25.5-5-206 whose family income does not exceed a specified percentage of the federal poverty line, adjusted for family size and as set by the state board by rule, which percentage shall be not more than four hundred fifty percent.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1)(r)(I) of this section, if the money in the healthcare affordability and sustainability fee cash fund established pursuant to section 25.5-4-402.4, together with the corresponding federal matching funds, is insufficient to fully fund all of the purposes described in section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(b), after receiving recommendations from the Colorado healthcare affordability and sustainability enterprise established pursuant to section 25.5-4-402.4 (3), for persons eligible for a medicaid buy-in program established pursuant to section 25.5-5-206, the state board by rule adopted pursuant to the provisions of section 25.5-4-402.4 (6)(b)(III) may reduce the medical benefits offered, or the percentage of the federal poverty line, or may eliminate this eligibility group.

Repealed.

A qualified alien, who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, shall not be eligible for benefits under this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title, except as provided in section 25.5-5-103 (3), for five years after the date of entry into the United States unless he or she meets the exceptions described in the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Public Law 104-193, as amended. After five years, such qualified alien shall be eligible for benefits under this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title but shall have sponsor income and resources deemed to the individual or family under rules established by the state board of human services pursuant to section 26-2-137, C.R.S.

Notwithstanding the five-year waiting period established in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), but subject to the availability of sufficient appropriations and the receipt of federal financial participation, the state department may provide benefits under this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title to a pregnant woman who is a qualified alien and a child under nineteen years of age who is a qualified alien so long as such woman or child meets eligibility criteria other than citizenship.

A lawfully residing person who is receiving medicaid nursing facility care or home- and community-based services on July 1, 1997, must continue to receive such services as long as the person meets the eligibility requirements other than citizen status. State general funds may be used to reimburse such care in the event that federal financial participation is not available.

A pregnant person who is lawfully residing is eligible to receive medical assistance as long as the individual meets eligibility requirements other than those related to citizen or immigration status. State general funds may be used to reimburse such care in the event that federal financial participation is not available.

(4.5) (a) Subject to the receipt of federal financial participation, to the maximum extent allowed under federal law, a person who was eligible for the medical assistance program for the sixty days following the pregnancy remains continuously eligible for all services under the medical assistance program for the twelve-month postpartum period.

The state department shall seek any plan amendment necessary to implement a twelve-month postpartum benefit pursuant to this subsection (4.5) and shall implement the benefit only upon receipt of federal authorization and financial participation, and no later than July 1, 2022.

If permissible under federal law, an eligible individual within the postpartum period may resume coverage under the medical assistance program upon implementation of this section.

An asset test shall not be applied as a condition of eligibility for individuals or families described in paragraphs (a), (h), and (m.5) of subsection (1) of this section.

Beginning no later than January 1, 2025, a pregnant person who is not a citizen and who is not eligible for medical assistance pursuant to subsection (4) of this section is eligible to receive medical assistance pursuant to this subsection (6)(a) if the individual meets the eligibility requirements other than those related to citizenship and immigration status.

A pregnant person who is eligible for medical assistance pursuant to this subsection (6) remains continuously eligible for all medical services pursuant to the medical assistance program for the twelve-month postpartum period, so long as eligibility remains in effect pursuant to subsection (4.5)(a) of this section.

The state department shall seek any necessary federal approvals to maximize any available federal financial participation in implementing this subsection (6). Benefits for services obtained pursuant to this subsection (6) must be provided with only state funds if federal financial participation is unavailable for such services.

During its 2024 presentation to the joint budget committee of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health and human services committee of the senate and the health and insurance committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, at the hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", the state department shall report on its plans and progress in implementing the coverage expansion created pursuant to this subsection (6).

Beginning January 1, 2026, and continuing every January thereafter, the state department, in its presentation to the joint budget committee of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health and human services committee of the senate and the health and insurance committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, at the hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", shall report on the cost savings and health improvements associated with the coverage expansion created pursuant to this subsection (6).

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1858, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(n) added, p. 897, § 1, effective May 15.

L. 2008:

(1)(l) and (1)(n) amended and (1)(o) added, pp. 1532, 2200, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(m)(I) and (1)(o) amended and (1)(p), (1)(q), and (1)(r) added, (HB 09-1293, ch. 152, p. 645, § 5, effective July 1; (2) amended, (HB 09-1353), ch. 390, p. 1869, § 2, effective July 1, 2010.

L. 2010:

(5)(c) added, (HB 10-1043), ch. 92, p. 312, § 2, effective April 15; (1)(m)(I), (1)(o)(II), (1)(p)(I), (1)(p)(II), (1)(r)(I), and (1)(r)(II) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2111, § 144, effective August 11.

L. 2013:

(1)(m) and (1)(p) amended, (SB 13-200), ch. 216, p. 898, § 2, effective May 13.

L. 2014:

(1)(d), (1)(e), and (1)(n) repealed, (1)(m.5) added, and (5) amended, (SB 14-067), ch. 12, p. 113, § 5, effective February 27.

L. 2017:

IP(1), (1)(o)(II), and (1)(r)(II) amended, (SB 17-267), ch. 267, p. 1465, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(4.5) added, (SB 21-194), ch. 434, p. 2871, § 7, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

IP(1) and (1)(m.5) amended, (SB 22-052), ch. 43, p. 217, § 3, effective March 24; (3), (4), and (4.5)(a) amended and (6) added, (HB 22-1289), ch. 399, p. 2842, § 16, effective June 7.

25.5-5-202. Basic services for the categorically needy - optional services.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the following are services for which federal financial participation is available and that Colorado has selected to provide as optional services under the medical assistance program:

Prescribed drugs.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a), pursuant to the provisions of section 25.5-5-503, prescribed drugs shall not be a covered benefit under the medical assistance program for a recipient who is enrolled in a prescription drug benefit program under medicare; except that, if a prescribed drug is not a covered Part D drug as defined in the "Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003", Pub.L. 108-173, the prescribed drug may be a covered benefit if it is otherwise covered under the medical assistance program and federal financial participation is available.

Over-the-counter medications, as specified in section 25.5-5-322;

Clinic services, as defined in sections 25.5-5-301 and 25.5-5-302;

Home- and community-based services, as specified in article 6 of this title 25.5, which include:

Home- and community-based services for individuals who are elderly or blind and individuals with disabilities, as specified in part 3 of article 6 of this title;

Home- and community-based services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as specified in part 4 of article 6 of this title;

Repealed.

Home- and community-based services for persons with major mental health disorders, as specified in part 6 of article 6 of this title 25.5;

Home- and community-based services for persons with brain injury, as specified in part 7 of article 6 of this title;

Optometrist services;

Eyeglasses when necessary after surgery;

Prosthetic devices, including medically necessary augmentative communication devices; except that nonsurgically implanted prosthetic devices shall be included only after July 1, 1998, and only if the general assembly approves appropriations for these devices as a new benefit;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(g) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Rehabilitation services as appropriate to community mental health centers;

(g)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(g) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Rehabilitation services as appropriate to behavioral health safety net providers as defined in section 27-50-101;

Intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities;

Inpatient psychiatric services for persons under twenty-one years of age;

Inpatient psychiatric services for persons over the age of sixty-five;

Case management;

Therapies under home health services, including:

Speech and audiology;

Physical;

Occupational;

Services of a licensed psychologist;

Private duty nursing services;

Podiatry services;

Hospice care;

The program of all-inclusive care for the elderly;

For any pregnant woman who is enrolled or eligible for services pursuant to section 25.5-5-101 (1)(c), alcohol and substance use disorder counseling and treatment, including outpatient and residential care but not including room and board while receiving residential care;

Outpatient substance use disorder treatment.

Repealed.

Cervical cancer immunization for all females under twenty years of age;

Screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment for individuals at risk of substance abuse, including referral to the appropriate level of intervention and treatment.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (u), services relating to screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment shall not take effect unless all necessary approvals under federal law and regulation have been obtained to receive federal financial participation for the costs of such services.

Counseling by primary care providers and other specialty providers caring for persons with serious, chronic, or terminal illness relating to medical orders for scope of treatment, which counseling may be reimbursed.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (v), counseling relating to medical orders for scope of treatment shall not take effect unless all necessary approvals under federal law and regulation have been obtained to receive federal financial participation for the costs of such services.

Dental services for adults.

Residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment and medical detoxification services pursuant to section 25.5-5-325.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1)(x)(I) of this section, residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment shall not take effect unless all necessary approvals under federal law and regulation have been obtained to receive federal financial participation for the costs of such services.

For any perinatal person, comprehensive lactation support services, lactation supplies and equipment, and maintenance of multi-user loaned equipment. An individual trained in advanced lactation support shall provide the lactation support services. Lactation equipment must include a single-user double electric breast pump, pump parts and pump collection kit, and access to a loaned multi-user hospital grade electric breast pump along with a compatible individual collection kit. Individuals must have access to single-user lactation supplies and equipment prior to delivery. Access to multi-user loaned breast pumps shall be authorized by a health-care provider. Access to multi-user loaned breast pumps is prioritized for individuals with premature, medically fragile, low birth weight infants, and with lactation complications. Individuals cannot be required to enroll in separate or additional programs in order to receive covered lactation equipment or lactation support services.

In addition to the services described in subsection (1) of this section and subject to continued federal financial participation, Colorado has selected to provide transportation services as an administrative cost.

In order to keep expenditures within approved appropriations, the state board may, by rule, establish limits on a service provided pursuant to this section so long as the service provided is sufficient in the amount, duration, and scope to reasonably achieve the purpose of the service as required by federal law or regulation. When a rule is promulgated pursuant to this subsection (3), the state board shall provide a summary report of the limitations established by the rule and any fiscal impact of the rule to members of the health and human services committees of the senate and house of representatives, or any successor committees, and any other members of the general assembly who request the reports.

The state department and the behavioral health administration in the department of human services, in collaboration with community mental health services providers and substance use disorder providers, shall establish rules that standardize utilization management authority timelines for the nonpharmaceutical components of medication-assisted treatment for substance use disorders.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1860, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(t) added, p. 1348, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 2010:

(1)(r) amended, (HB 10-1043), ch. 92, p. 313, § 3, effective April 15; (1)(a.5) added, (SB 10-117), ch. 227, p. 985, § 1, effective July 1; (1)(u) added, (HB 10-1033), ch. 346, p. 1601, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2013:

(1)(h) amended, (SB 13-167), ch. 394, p. 2290, § 2, effective June 5; (1)(u)(II) amended and (1)(w) added, (SB 13-242), ch. 189, p. 761, § 1, effective August 7; (1)(v) added, (HB 13-1202), ch. 117, p. 401, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(1)(r) amended, (SB 14-067), ch. 12, p. 114, § 6, effective February 27; (1)(c)(I) and (1)(c)(II) amended, (SB 14-118), ch. 250, p. 985, § 20, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

IP(1), (1)(r), and (1)(s)(I) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1327, § 199, effective May 25; (1)(s)(II) repealed, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1409, § 92, effective May 25.

L. 2018:

(1)(x) added, (HB 18-1136), ch. 373, p. 2269, § 1, effective June 5; IP(1)(c) and (1)(c)(IV) amended, (SB 18-091), ch. 35, p. 388, § 25, effective August 8; (1)(c)(III) repealed, (SB 18-093), ch. 62, p. 610, § 3, effective August 8; (4) added, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1893, § 14, effective January 1, 2019.

L. 2022:

(1)(y) added, (HB 22-1289), ch. 399, p. 2843, § 17, effective June 7; (4) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1513, § 69, effective July 1; (1)(g) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1593, § 233, effective July 1, 2024.

25.5-5-203. Optional programs with special state provisions.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, this section specifies programs developed by Colorado to increase federal financial participation through selecting optional services or optional eligible groups. These programs include but are not limited to:

Pharmaceutical services, as specified in section 25.5-5-504;

The home- and community-based services program for the elderly, blind, and disabled, as specified in part 3 of article 6 of this title;

The home- and community-based services program for the developmentally disabled, as specified in part 4 of article 6 of this title;

Repealed.

The home- and community-based services program for persons with major mental health disorders, as specified in part 6 of article 6 of this title 25.5;

The home- and community-based services program for persons with brain injury, as specified in part 7 of article 6 of this title;

Clinic services, as defined in sections 25.5-5-301 and 25.5-5-302;

The program for private duty nursing, as specified in section 25.5-5-303;

The disabled children care program, as specified in section 25.5-6-901;

The program of all-inclusive care for the elderly, as specified in section 25.5-5-412;

Hospice care, as specified in section 25.5-5-304;

The treatment program for high-risk pregnant women, as specified in section 27-80-112, C.R.S., and sections 25.5-5-309, 25.5-5-310, and 25.5-5-311;

The program for residential child health care, as specified in section 25.5-6-903;

The children's personal assistance services and family support waiver program, as specified in section 25.5-6-902;

Home- and community-based services for children with autism, as specified in part 8 of article 6 of this title.

In order to keep expenditures within approved appropriations, the state board may, by rule, establish limits on a service provided pursuant to this section so long as the service provided is sufficient in the amount, duration, and scope to reasonably achieve the purpose of the service as required by federal law or regulation. When a rule is promulgated pursuant to this subsection (2), the state board shall provide a summary report of the limitations established by the rule and any fiscal impact of the rule to members of the health and human services committees of the senate and house of representatives, or any successor committees, and any other members of the general assembly who request the reports.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1862, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(l) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 801, § 67, effective April 29.

L. 2018:

(1)(d) repealed, (SB 18-093), ch. 62, p. 610, § 4, effective August 8; (1)(e) amended, (SB 18-091), ch. 35, p. 388, § 26, effective August 8; (1)(m) amended, (HB 18-1328), ch. 184, p. 1244, § 5, effective June 7, 2019.

25.5-5-204. Presumptive eligibility - pregnant person - children - long-term care - state plan.

For purposes of this section, "presumptive eligibility" means the self-declaration of income, assets, and status in order to promptly receive medical assistance services prior to the verification of income, assets, and status.

A pregnant person is presumptively eligible for the medical assistance program and shall receive services specified by federal law only if the person declares all pertinent information relating to the criteria of income, assets, and, only if necessary to administer reimbursement for services, status.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

(2.5) A child less than nineteen years of age is presumptively eligible for the medical assistance program and shall receive services specified by federal law only if a parent or legal guardian of the child declares all pertinent information relating to the criteria of income, assets, and, only if necessary to administer reimbursement for services, status of the child's family.

(2.7)

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2.7)(a) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The state department is authorized to seek federal authorization to allow a person who is in need of long-term care, as defined in section 25.5-6-104, to be presumptively eligible for the medical assistance program pursuant to this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title.

(2.7)

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2.7)(a) is effective July 1, 2024.] The state department is authorized to seek federal authorization to allow a person who is in need of long-term services and supports, as defined in section 25.5-6-1702 (10), to be presumptively eligible for the medical assistance program pursuant to this article 5 and articles 4 and 6 of this title 25.5.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2.7)(b) is effective until July 1, 2024.] If the state department receives federal authorization pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.7) and sufficient spending authority, a person in need of long-term care shall be presumptively eligible for the medical assistance program if the person or the person's legal representative declares all pertinent information relating to the criteria of income, assets, and immigration status. Such person shall be assessed for the appropriate level of care pursuant to section 25.5-6-104. If required due to limitations of federal authorization or spending authority, the state department may implement this paragraph (b) as a pilot program rather than statewide.

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2.7)(b) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

If the state department receives federal authorization pursuant to subsection (2.7)(a) of this section and sufficient spending authority, a person in need of long-term services and supports shall be presumptively eligible for the medical assistance program if the person or the person's legal representative declares all pertinent information relating to the criteria of income, assets, and immigration status. The person shall be assessed for the appropriate level of care pursuant to section 25.5-6-1704. If required due to limitations of federal authorization or spending authority, the state department may implement this subsection (2.7)(b) as a pilot program rather than statewide.

The state department shall make any necessary changes to the state plan and waivers for home- and community-based service programs authorized pursuant to this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title to comply with this subsection (2.7).

If it is determined that a recipient was not eligible for medical benefits after the recipient had been determined to be eligible based upon presumptive eligibility, the state department shall not pursue recovery from a county department for the cost of medical services provided to the recipient, and the county department shall not be responsible for any federal error rate sanctions resulting from such determination.

The state department shall make any necessary changes to the state plan to comply with this section.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1864, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2.5) added, p. 1493, § 4, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

(2.7) added, (HB 09-1103), ch. 160, p. 694, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2021:

(2.7)(a) and (2.7)(b) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 332, § 26, effective July 1, 2024.

L. 2022:

(2) and (2.5) amended, (HB 22-1289), ch. 399, p. 2844, § 18, effective June 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-304 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act enacting subsection (2.5), see section 1 of chapter 347, Session Laws of Colorado 2007. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1289, see section 1 of chapter 399, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

25.5-5-204.5. Continuous eligibility - children.

A child who is determined to be eligible for benefits under this article or under article 4 or 6 of this title shall remain eligible for twelve months subsequent to the last day of the month in which the child was enrolled; except that a child shall no longer be eligible and shall be disenrolled from the state medical assistance program if the state department becomes aware of or is notified that the child has moved out of the state or has reached nineteen years of age.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, if the money in the healthcare affordability and sustainability fee cash fund established pursuant to section 25.5-4-402.4, together with the corresponding federal matching funds, is insufficient to fully fund all of the purposes described in section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(b), after receiving recommendations from the Colorado healthcare affordability and sustainability enterprise established pursuant to section 25.5-4-402.4 (3), the state board by rule adopted pursuant to the provisions of section 25.5-4-402.4 (6)(b)(III) may eliminate the continuous enrollment requirement pursuant to this section.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1293), ch. 152, p. 648, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (SB 17-267), ch. 267, p. 1466, § 20, effective July 1.

25.5-5-205. Baby and kid care program - creation - eligibility. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1864, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(3)(d) amended, p. 1493, § 5, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2010:

(3)(a) and (3)(c)(I) amended, (HB 10-1043), ch. 92, p. 313, § 4, effective April 15.

L. 2011:

(3)(b) amended, (SB 11-250), ch. 219, p. 950, § 1, effective May 27; (3)(c) amended, (SB 11-008), ch. 100, p. 293, § 2, effective September 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (SB 14-067), ch. 12, p. 114, § 7, effective February 27.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 26-4-508 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-5-206. Medicaid buy-in program - disabled children - disabled adults - federal authorization - rules.

Subject to available appropriations, the state department is authorized to seek federal authorization to and to establish a medicaid buy-in program or programs for:

Disabled children; or

Disabled adults who do not qualify for the medicaid buy-in program established pursuant to part 14 of article 6 of this title.

The medicaid buy-in program or programs established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) may provide for premium and cost-sharing charges on a sliding fee scale based upon a family's income.

The state board shall promulgate rules consistent with any federal authorization to implement and administer the medicaid buy-in program or programs established pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1293), ch. 152, p. 698, § 6, effective July 1.

25.5-5-207. Adult dental benefit - adult dental fund - creation - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that:

As of 2011, Colorado was one of only ten states that did not offer basic oral health services to adults under medicaid;

Research has shown that untreated oral health conditions negatively affect a person's overall health and that gum disease has been linked to diabetes, heart disease, strokes, kidney disease, dementia diseases and related disabilities, and even behavioral or mental health disorders;

Regular dental care and prevention are the most cost-effective methods available to prevent minor oral conditions from developing into more complex oral and physical health conditions that would eventually require emergency and palliative care;

Further, one in four adults has untreated tooth decay. Early detection and access to preventive and restorative treatments for oral health conditions can be up to ten times less expensive than treating those same conditions in an emergency setting.

Research has also shown that good oral health improves medicaid beneficiaries' ability to obtain and keep employment. Employed adults lose more than one hundred and sixty-four million hours of work each year due to dental problems.

Children are more likely to receive regular dental services if their parents have access to dental services; and

Pregnant women are one of the most vulnerable adult populations that are without oral health benefits under medicaid. During pregnancy, the physical changes a woman's body undergoes can negatively affect oral health. Untreated decay and periodontal disease are associated with adverse pregnancy outcomes such as increased risk for preeclampsia, pre-term labor, and low birth weight babies.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that in order to improve overall health, promote savings in medicaid programs, and prevent future health conditions caused by oral health problems, it is in the best interest of the state of Colorado to create a limited oral health benefit for adults in the medicaid program.

Pursuant to section 25.5-5-202 (1)(w), by April 1, 2014, the state department shall design and implement a limited dental benefit for adults using a collaborative stakeholder process to consider the components of the benefit, including but not limited to the cost, best practices, the effect on health outcomes, client experience, service delivery models, and maximum efficiencies in the administration of the benefit.

The state department shall determine the most cost-effective method for providing the adult dental benefit, including but not limited to a comparison of a capitated or fee-for-service method of payment and the purchase of dental insurance.

The state department shall seek any federal authorization necessary to provide the adult dental benefit.

Subject to federal authorization and federal financial participation, on or after July 1, 2016, the diagnosis, development of a treatment plan, instruction to perform an interim therapeutic restoration procedure, or supervision of a dental hygienist performing an interim therapeutic restoration procedure may be provided through telehealth, including store-and-forward transfer, in accordance with section 25.5-5-321.5.

(2.5) Repealed.

If the state department chooses to use an administrative service organization to manage the adult dental benefit:

The contract with the administrative service organization must provide that the contracting entity is prohibited from requiring dental providers to participate in any other public or private program or to accept any other insurance products as a condition of participating as a dental provider; and

The state department shall retain policy-making authority, including but not limited to policies concerning covered benefits and rate setting.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the adult dental fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", consisting of money transferred to the fund from the unclaimed property trust fund pursuant to section 38-13-801 (3) and any money that may be appropriated to the fund by the general assembly. The money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the state department for the direct and indirect costs associated with implementing the adult dental benefit pursuant to section 25.5-5-202 (1)(w).

The state treasurer may invest any unexpended moneys in the fund as provided by law. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the fund to the fund.

Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-242), ch. 189, p. 761, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2015:

(2)(d) added, (HB 15-1309), ch. 326, p. 1334, § 7, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

IP(1)(a) and (1)(a)(II) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1327, § 200, effective May 25.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(II) amended, (HB 18-1091), ch. 74, p. 642, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 467, § 11, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2020:

(2.5) added, (HB 20-1361), ch. 161, p. 756, § 1, effective June 29.

L. 2021:

(2.5) repealed, (SB 21-211), ch. 86, p. 358, § 1, effective May 4.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

25.5-5-208. Additional services - training - grants - screening, brief intervention, and referral.

On or after July 1, 2018, the state department shall grant, through a competitive grant program, one million five hundred thousand dollars to one or more organizations to operate a substance abuse screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment practice. The grant program must require:

Training for health-care professionals statewide, including providers who serve women of childbearing age, that is evidence-based and that may be attended either in person or online. The training must include training for reimbursement and billing codes in the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act", articles 4 to 6 of this title 25.5.

Consultation and technical assistance for health-care providers, health-care organizations, and stakeholders;

Outreach, communication, and education to providers and patients;

Coordination with primary care, mental health care, integrated health care, and substance use prevention, treatment, and recovery efforts; and

Campaigning to increase public awareness of the risks related to alcohol, marijuana, tobacco, and drug use and to reduce any stigma associated with treatment.

The state department contractor shall develop a patient education tool for women of childbearing age to learn about the risks of substance-exposed pregnancies, to be deployed for public use in the state.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1367), ch. 271, p. 1078, § 17, effective January 1, 2016.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1003), ch. 224, p. 1428, § 4, effective May 21.